Montana, session 2025, LC1871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 3-2-401, MCA, is amended to read:
"3-2-401. Election and term of office. There must be a clerk of the supreme court who must be
elected by the electors at large of the state in a nonpartisan election as provided in Title 13, chapter 14. and
The clerk must hold office for the term of 6 years from the first Monday of January following the clerk's election."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Applicability. [This act] applies to elections for the office of the clerk of
the supreme court held on or after [the effective date of this act].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****